Washington statutes.
RCW 41.44.170

Allowance on retirement for disability.

On retirement for permanent and total disability not incurred in line of duty a member shall receive a retirement allowance which shall consist of:

(1) An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his or her accumulated normal contributions; and

(2) A pension provided by the contributions of the city which, together with his or her annuity provided by his or her accumulated normal contributions, shall make his or her retirement allowance equal to thirty percent of his or her final compensation for the first ten years of service, which allowance shall be increased by one and one-half percent for each year of service in excess of ten years to a maximum of fifty percent of his or her final compensation; otherwise he or she shall receive a retirement allowance of forty dollars per month or, except as to a part time employee, such sum, monthly, not in excess of sixty dollars per month, as is equal to six dollars per month for each year of his or her creditable service, whichever is greater. If the retirement allowance of a part time employee, based upon the pension hereinabove provided, does not exceed forty dollars per month, then such part time employee shall receive a retirement allowance of forty dollars per month and no more.

Nothing herein contained shall be construed in a manner to increase or to decrease any pension being paid or to be paid to a member retired prior to August 6, 1965.

(3) If it appears to the satisfaction of the board that permanent and total disability was incurred in line of duty, a member shall receive in lieu of the retirement allowance provided under subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section full pay from, and be furnished all hospital and medical care by, the city for a period of six months from the date of his or her disability, and commencing at the expiration of such six month period, shall receive a retirement allowance, regardless of his or her age or years of service, equal to fifty percent of his or her final compensation exclusive of any other benefit he or she may receive.

(4) No disability retirement allowance shall exceed seventy-five percent of final compensation, anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, except as provided in subdivision (7) of this section.

(5) Upon the death of a member while in receipt of a disability retirement allowance, his or her accumulated contributions, as they were at the date of his or her retirement, less any annuity payments made to him or her, shall be paid to his or her estate, or to such persons having an insurable interest in his or her life as he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the board. In the alternative, if there be a surviving spouse, or if no surviving spouse, there are surviving a child or children under the age of eighteen years, upon written notice to the board by such spouse, or if there be no such spouse, by the duly appointed, qualified and acting guardian of such child or children, within sixty days of the date of such member's death, there shall be paid to such spouse during his or her lifetime, or, if there be no such spouse, to such child or children, until they shall reach the age of eighteen years, a monthly pension equal to one-half of the monthly final compensation of such deceased member. If any such spouse or child or children shall marry, then such person so marrying shall thereafter receive no further pension herein provided.

(6) If disability is due to intemperance, willful misconduct, or violation of law, on the part of the member, the board, in its discretion, may pay to said member, in one lump sum his or her accumulated contribution, in lieu of a retirement allowance, and such payment shall constitute full satisfaction of all obligations of the city to such member.

(7) In addition to the annuity and pension provided for in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section, a member shall receive an annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his or her accumulated additional contributions.

[ 2012 c 117 s 70; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 78; 1965 ex.s. c 99 s 7; 1961 c 227 s 7; 1957 c 158 s 5; 1953 c 228 s 7; 1951 c 275 s 13; 1947 c 71 s 17; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9592-146.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.